Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.80.020

Electric energy.

Any code city is authorized to enter into contracts or compacts with any commission or any operating agency or publicly or privately owned utility for the purchase and sale of electric energy or falling waters as provided in RCW 43.52.410 and chapter 35.84 RCW and to exercise any other authority granted to cities as provided in chapter 43.52 RCW.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.80.020.]